Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1902
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Crush Transnational Repression in Nebraska Act is to counter the threat and practice of transnational repression committed by foreign governments or foreign terrorist organizations against the citizens and residents of this state, and to counter the threat and practice of foreign government interstate harassment through extranational enforcement of foreign government laws and directives.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 15.